Utah statutes.
77-16a-305.   Conditional release.

(1)  If the review team finds that a defendant is not eligible for discharge, in accordance with Section 77-16a-304, but that his mental illness and dangerousness can be controlled with proper care, medication, supervision, and treatment if he is conditionally released, the review team shall prepare a report and notify the executive director, or his designee, that the defendant is a candidate for conditional release.

(2)  The executive director, or his designee, shall prepare a conditional release plan, listing the type of care and treatment that the individual needs and recommending a treatment provider.

(3)  The executive director, or his designee, shall provide the court, the defendant's attorney, and the prosecuting attorney with a copy of the report issued by the review team under Subsection (1), and the conditional release plan.  The court shall conduct a hearing on the issue of conditional release within 30 days after receipt of those documents.

(4)  The court may order that a defendant be conditionally released if it finds that, even though the defendant presents a substantial danger to himself or others, he can be adequately controlled with supervision and treatment that is available and provided for in the conditional release plan.

(5)  The department may provide treatment or contract with a local mental health authority or other public or private provider to provide treatment for a defendant who is conditionally released under this section.



Amended by Chapter 285, 1993 General Session

